Hawaii, session 2026, HB2179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that electric bicycles have become widely available for personal transportation and are popular among citizens of all ages.  In March 2023, there were five thousand three hundred registered electric bicycles. This figure is potentially higher, considering that many owners do not register their bikes, especially if they are purchased online. The legislature further finds that preliminary data from the department of transportation shows that from the start of 2025 till early September, there has been ninety-three traffic deaths statewide.  This is a stark difference compared to the sixty-six traffic fatalities that occurred at the same time last year.  Approximately ninety-one per cent of the deaths involved risky or negligent behavior such as speeding, failure to yield, improper pedestrian actions, and failing to use safety equipment such as seat belts and helmets.  Safety of Hawaiis roadways continues to be a persistent matter of public concern.  The legislature believes that, in the wake of a recent surge in ridership accidents, it is critical to address the unsafe operation of electric bicycles. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require, rather than just authorize, the department of education to develop and administer a traffic safety education program; and (2)  Require the department of education's traffic safety education program to include electric bicycles. SECTION 2.  Section 302A-417, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§302A-417[]] Traffic safety education. (a)  The department [may] shall establish and administer a traffic safety education program to be conducted at each public school for students from grades kindergarten through twelve.  The program shall include, but not be limited to, general electric bicycle riding safety, rules of the road, and laws pertaining to electric bicycles. (b)  The department may establish the requirements for the position of traffic safety education specialist and may employ at least one traffic safety education specialist for the purposes of this section.  The traffic safety education specialist may be paid out of fees allocated to the director of commerce and consumer affairs from the special drivers education fund account pursuant to section 431:10C-115." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.